California statutes. Penal Code
(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

29865.

Law enforcement officials who enforce the prohibition specified in Section 29805 against a person who has been granted relief pursuant to Section 29855 or 29860 shall be immune from any liability for false arrest arising from the enforcement of Section 29805 unless the person has in possession a certified copy of the court order that granted the person relief from the prohibition. This immunity from liability shall not relieve any person or entity from any other
 liability that might otherwise be imposed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Miscellaneous Provisions [29875. - 29880.]

29875.

Subject to available funding, the Attorney General, working with the Judicial Council, the California Alliance Against Domestic Violence, prosecutors, and law enforcement, probation, and parole officers, shall develop a protocol for the implementation of the provisions of Section 12021, as it reads in Section 2 of Chapter 830 of the Statutes of 2002, and as later amended at any time before completion of the protocol. The protocol shall be designed to facilitate the enforcement of restrictions on firearm ownership, including provisions for giving notice to defendants who are restricted, provisions for informing those defendants of the procedures by which defendants shall dispose of firearms when required to do so, provisions explaining how defendants shall provide proof of the
 lawful disposition of firearms, and provisions explaining how defendants may obtain possession of seized firearms when legally permitted to do so pursuant to any provision of law. The protocol shall be completed on or before January 1, 2005.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

29880.

(a) If the Department of Justice determines that a person prohibited from owning, purchasing, receiving, or possessing a firearm by this chapter, Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 29900), or Section 8100 or 8103 of the Welfare and Institutions Code has attempted to acquire a firearm, or has attempted to report their acquisition or ownership of a firearm in order to have it listed in the registry set forth in Section 11106 as owned by that person, whether the report is mandated by this part or made pursuant to Section 28000, the department shall notify the local law enforcement agency with primary jurisdiction over the area in which the person was last known to reside of the attempt in a manner and format prescribed by the
 Department of Justice.

(b) If a person described in subdivision (a) is prohibited from owning or possessing a firearm pursuant to Section 8100 or 8103 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the department shall also notify the county department of mental health in the county in which the person was last known to reside.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 100, Sec. 1.   (AB 2551)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Person Convicted of Violent Offense [29900. - 29905.]

29900.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 29800, any person who has been previously convicted of any of the offenses listed in Section 29905 and who owns or has in possession or under custody or control any firearm is guilty of a felony.

(2) A dismissal of an accusatory pleading pursuant to Section 1203.4a involving an offense set forth in Section 29905 does not affect the finding of a previous conviction.

(3) If probation is granted, or if the imposition or execution of sentence is suspended, it shall be a condition of the probation or suspension that the defendant serve at least six months in a
 county jail.

(b) (1) Any person previously convicted of any of the offenses listed in Section 29905 which conviction results from certification by the juvenile court for prosecution as an adult in adult court under the provisions of Section 707 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, who owns or has in possession or under custody or control any firearm, is guilty of a felony.

(2) If probation is granted, or if the imposition or execution of sentence is suspended, it shall be a condition of the probation or suspension that the defendant serve at least six months in a county jail.

(c) The court shall apply the minimum sentence as specified in subdivisions (a) and (b) except in unusual cases where the interests of justice would best be served by granting probation or suspending the imposition or
 execution of sentence without the imprisonment required by subdivisions (a) and (b), or by granting probation or suspending the imposition or execution of sentence with conditions other than those set forth in subdivisions (a) and (b), in which case the court shall specify on the record and shall enter on the minutes the circumstances indicating that the interests of justice would best be served by the disposition.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

29905.

(a) As used in this chapter, a violent offense includes any of the following:

(1) Murder or voluntary manslaughter.

(2) Mayhem.

(3) Rape.

(4) Sodomy by force, violence, duress, menace, or threat of great bodily harm.

(5) Oral copulation by force, violence, duress, menace, or threat of great bodily harm.

(6) Lewd acts on a child under the age of 14 years.

(7) Any felony punishable by death or imprisonment in the state prison for life.

(8) Any other felony in which the defendant inflicts great bodily injury on any person, other than an accomplice, that has been charged and proven, or any felony in which the defendant uses a firearm which use has been charged and proven.

(9) Attempted murder.

(10) Assault with intent to commit rape or robbery.

(11) Assault with a deadly weapon or instrument on a peace officer.

(12) Assault by a life prisoner on a noninmate.

(13) Assault with a deadly weapon by an inmate.

(14) Arson.

(15) Exploding a destructive device or any explosive with intent to injure.

(16) Exploding a destructive device or any explosive causing great bodily injury.

(17) Exploding a destructive device or any explosive with intent to murder.

(18) Robbery.

(19) Kidnapping.

(20) Taking of a hostage by an inmate of a state prison.

(21) Attempt to commit a felony punishable by death or imprisonment in the state prison for life.

(22) Any
 felony in which the defendant personally used a dangerous or deadly weapon.

(23) Escape from a state prison by use of force or violence.

(24) Assault with a deadly weapon or force likely to produce great bodily injury.

(25) Any felony violation of Section 186.22.

(26) Any offense enumerated in subdivision (a), (b), or (d) of Section 23515.

(27) Carjacking.

(28) Any offense enumerated in subdivision (c) of Section 23515 if the person has two or more convictions for violating paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 417.

(b) As used in this chapter, a violent
 offense also includes any attempt to commit a crime listed in subdivision (a) other than an assault.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Prohibited Armed Persons File [30000. - 30020.]

30000.

(a) The Attorney General shall establish and maintain an online database to be known as the Prohibited Armed Persons File. The purpose of the file is to cross-reference persons who have ownership or possession of a firearm on or after January 1, 1996, as indicated by a record in the Consolidated Firearms Information System, and who, subsequent to the date of that ownership or possession of a firearm, fall within a class of persons who are prohibited from owning or possessing a firearm.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), the information contained in the
 Prohibited Armed Persons File shall only be available to those entities specified in, and pursuant to, subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 11105, through the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System, for the purpose of determining if persons are armed and prohibited from possessing firearms.

(c) The information contained in the Prohibited Armed Persons File shall be available to researchers affiliated with the California Firearm Violence Research Center at UC Davis following approval by the institution’s governing institutional review board, when required. At the department’s discretion, and subject to Section 14240, the data may be provided to any other nonprofit bona fide research institution accredited by the United States Department of Education or the Council for Higher Education Accreditation for the study of the prevention of violence, following
 approval by the institution’s governing institutional review board or human subjects committee, when required, for academic and policy research purposes. Material identifying individuals shall only be provided for research or statistical activities and shall not be transferred, revealed, or used for purposes other than research or statistical activities, and reports or publications derived therefrom shall not identify specific individuals. Reasonable costs to the department associated with the department’s processing of that data may be billed to the researcher. If a request for data or letter of support for research using the data is denied, the department shall provide a written statement of the specific reasons for the denial.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 253, Sec. 10.   (AB 173)   Effective September 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

30005.

The Prohibited Armed Persons File database shall function as follows:

(a) Upon entry into the Automated Criminal History System of a disposition for a conviction of any felony, a conviction for any firearms-prohibiting charge specified in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29800), a conviction for an offense described in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 29900), a firearms prohibition pursuant to Section 8100 or 8103 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or any firearms possession prohibition identified by the federal National Instant Criminal Background Check System, the Department of Justice shall determine if the subject has an entry in the Consolidated Firearms Information System indicating possession or ownership of a firearm on or after January 1,
 1996, or an assault weapon registration, or a .50 BMG rifle registration.

(b) Upon an entry into any department automated information system that is used for the identification of persons who are prohibited by state or federal law from acquiring, owning, or possessing firearms, the department shall determine if the subject has an entry in the Consolidated Firearms Information System indicating ownership or possession of a firearm on or after January 1, 1996, or an assault weapon registration, or a .50 BMG rifle registration.

(c) If the department determines that, pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b), the subject has an entry in the Consolidated
 Firearms Information System indicating possession or ownership of a firearm on or after January 1, 1996, or an assault weapon registration, or a .50 BMG rifle registration, the following information shall be entered into the Prohibited Armed Persons File:

(1) The subject’s name.

(2) The subject’s date of birth.

(3) The subject’s physical description.

(4) Any other identifying information regarding the subject that is deemed necessary by the Attorney General.

(5) The basis of the firearms
 possession prohibition.

(6) A description of all firearms owned or possessed by the subject, as reflected by the Consolidated Firearms Information System.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 182, Sec. 2.   (AB 2300)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

30010.

(a) The Attorney General shall provide investigative assistance to local law enforcement agencies to better ensure the investigation of individuals who are armed and prohibited from possessing a firearm.

(b) The Attorney General shall provide local law enforcement agencies all of the following information relating to prohibited persons listed in the Prohibited Armed Persons File in their jurisdiction:

(1) Personal identifying information.

(2) Case status.

(3) Prohibition type or reason.

(4) Prohibition expiration date.

(5) Known firearms associated to the prohibited person.

(6) Information regarding previous contacts with the prohibited person, if applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 161, Sec. 1.   (AB 303)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

30012.

(a) No later than March 15, 2024, and no later than March 15 of each year thereafter, the Department of Justice shall report to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the fiscal committees of each house of the Legislature all of the following information for the immediately preceding calendar year:

(1) The total number of individuals in the Armed Prohibited
 Persons System (APPS) and the number of cases which are active and pending, as follows:

(A) (i) For active cases, the department shall report the status of each case for which the department has initiated an investigation. This information shall include, at a minimum, the number of cases that have not been actively investigated for 12 months or longer, along with a breakdown of the time period that has elapsed since a case was added to the system.

(ii) For purposes of this paragraph, “investigation” means any work conducted by sworn or nonsworn staff to determine whether a prohibited person possesses one or more firearms, whether to remove the person from the database, or whether to shift the person to the pending caseload.

(B) For pending cases, the department shall separately report the number
 of cases that are unable to be cleared, unable to be located, related to out-of-state individuals, related to only federal firearms prohibitions, and related to incarcerated individuals.

(2) The number of individuals added to the APPS database.

(3) The number of individuals removed from the APPS database, including a breakdown of the basis on which they were removed. At a minimum, this information shall separately report those cases that were removed because the individual is deceased, had prohibitions expire or removed, or had their cases resolved as a result of department firearm seizure activities.

(4) The degree to which the backlog in the APPS has been reduced or eliminated. For purposes of this section, “backlog” means the number of cases for which the department did not initiate an investigation within six
 months of the case being added to the APPS or has not completed investigatory work within six months of initiating an investigation on the case.

(5) The number of individuals in the APPS before and after the relevant reporting period, including a breakdown of why each individual in the APPS is prohibited from possessing a firearm.

(6) The number of agents and other staff hired for enforcement of the APPS.

(7) The number of firearms recovered due to enforcement of the APPS.

(8) The number of contacts made during the APPS enforcement efforts.

(9) Information regarding task forces or collaboration with local law enforcement on reducing the APPS file or backlog.

(b) For purposes of this section, “Armed Prohibited Persons System” means the “Prohibited Armed Persons File,” as described in Section 30000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 47, Sec. 24.   (AB 134)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

30015.

(a) The sum of twenty-four million dollars ($24,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the Dealers’ Record of Sale Special Account of the General Fund to the Department of Justice to address the backlog in the Armed Prohibited Persons System (APPS) and the illegal possession of firearms by those prohibited persons.

(b) No later than March 1, 2015, and no later than March 1 each year thereafter, the department shall report to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee all of the following for
 the immediately preceding calendar year:

(1) The degree to which the backlog in the APPS has been reduced or eliminated.

(2) The number of agents hired for enforcement of the APPS.

(3) The number of people cleared from the APPS.

(4) The number of people added to the APPS.

(5) The number of people in the APPS before and after the relevant reporting period, including a breakdown of why each person in the APPS is prohibited from possessing a firearm.

(6) The number of firearms recovered due to enforcement of the APPS.

(7) The number of contacts made during the APPS enforcement efforts.

(8) Information regarding task forces or collaboration with local law enforcement on reducing the APPS backlog.

(c) (1) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under subdivision (b) is inoperative on March 1, 2019, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(2) A report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 2, Sec. 2.   (SB 140)   Effective May 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

30020.

(a) The Department of Justice shall complete an initial review of a match in the daily queue of the Armed Prohibited Persons System within seven days of the match being placed in the queue and shall periodically reassess whether the department can complete those reviews more efficiently.

(b) (1) For the purpose of this section, “Armed Prohibited Persons System” means the “Prohibited Armed Persons File,” as described in Section 30000.

(2) For the purpose of this section, “match” means the entry into the Automated Criminal History System or into any department automated information system of the name and other information of an individual who may be
 prohibited from acquiring, owning, or possessing a firearm, and a corresponding record of ownership or possession of a firearm by that individual, as described in Section 30005.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 638, Sec. 1.   (AB 1999)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Firearms Eligibility Check [30105. - 30165.]



  ARTICLE 1. Firearms Eligibility Check [30105. - 30105.]

30105.

(a) An individual may request that the Department of Justice perform a firearms eligibility check for that individual. The applicant requesting the eligibility check shall provide the personal information required by Section 28160 or 28165, as applicable, but not any information regarding any firearm, to the department, in an application specified by the department.

(b) The department shall charge a fee of twenty dollars ($20) for performing the eligibility check authorized by this section, but not to exceed the actual processing costs of the department. After the department establishes fees sufficient to reimburse the department for processing costs, fees charged may increase at a rate not to exceed the legislatively
 approved cost-of-living adjustment for the department’s budget or as otherwise increased through the Budget Act.

(c) An applicant for the eligibility check pursuant to subdivision (a) shall complete the application, have it notarized by any licensed California Notary Public, and submit it by mail to the department.

(d) Upon receipt of a notarized application and fee, the department shall do all of the following:

(1) Examine its records, and the records it is authorized to request from the State Department of State Hospitals pursuant to Section 8104 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, to determine if the purchaser is prohibited by state or federal law from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing a firearm.

(2) Notify the applicant by mail of its
 determination of whether the applicant is prohibited by state or federal law from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing a firearm. The department’s notification shall state either “eligible to possess firearms as of the date the check was completed” or “ineligible to possess firearms as of the date the check was completed.”

(e) If the department determines that the information submitted to it in the application contains any blank spaces, or inaccurate, illegible, or incomplete information, preventing identification of the applicant, or if the required fee is not submitted, the department shall not be required to perform the firearms eligibility check.

(f) The department shall make applications to conduct a firearms eligibility check as described in this section available to licensed firearms dealers and on the department’s Internet Web site.

(g) The department shall be immune from any liability arising out of the performance of the firearms eligibility check, or any reliance upon the firearms eligibility check.

(h) Except as provided in Sections 29180 and 29182, a person or agency shall not require or request an individual to obtain a firearms eligibility check or notification of a firearms eligibility check pursuant to this section. A violation of this subdivision is a misdemeanor.

(i) The department shall include on the application specified in subdivision (a) and the notification of eligibility specified in subdivision (d) the following statements:
“No person or agency may require or request an individual to obtain a firearms eligibility check or notification of firearms
 eligibility check pursuant to Section 30105 of the Penal Code. A violation of these provisions is a misdemeanor.”
“If the applicant for a firearms eligibility check purchases, transfers, or receives a firearm through a licensed dealer as required by law, a waiting period and background check are both required.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 60, Sec. 5.   (AB 857)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Exceptions Relating to Law Enforcement [30150. - 30165.]

30150.

(a) Section 30105 does not apply to any sale, delivery, or transfer of firearms made to an authorized law enforcement representative of any city, county, city and county, or state, or of the federal government, for exclusive use by that governmental agency if, prior to the sale, delivery, or transfer of these firearms, written authorization from the head of the agency authorizing the transaction is presented to the person from whom the purchase, delivery, or transfer is being made.

(b) Proper written authorization is defined as verifiable written certification from the head of the agency by which the purchaser or transferee is employed, identifying the employee as an individual authorized to conduct the transaction, and
 authorizing the transaction for the exclusive use of the agency by which that person is employed.

(c) Within 10 days of the date a handgun, and commencing January 1, 2014, any firearm, is acquired by the agency, a record of the same shall be entered as an institutional weapon into the Automated Firearms System (AFS) via the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System (CLETS) by the law enforcement or state agency. Any agency without access to AFS shall arrange with the sheriff of the county in which the agency is located to input this information via this system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 745, Sec. 63.   (AB 809)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

30155.

Section 30105 does not apply to the loan of a firearm if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(a) The loan is made by an authorized law enforcement representative of a city, county, or city and county, or of the state or federal government.

(b) The loan is made to a peace officer employed by that agency and authorized to carry a firearm.

(c) The loan is made for the carrying and use of that firearm by that peace officer in the course and scope of the officer’s duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

30160.

(a) Section 30105 does not apply to the sale, delivery, or transfer of a firearm by a law enforcement agency to a peace officer pursuant to Section 10334 of the Public Contract Code.

(b) Within 10 days of the date that a handgun, and commencing January 1, 2014, any firearm, is sold, delivered, or transferred pursuant to Section 10334 of the Public Contract Code to that peace officer, the name of the officer and the make, model, serial number, and other identifying characteristics of the firearm being sold, delivered, or transferred shall be entered into the Automated Firearms System (AFS) via the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System (CLETS) by the law enforcement or state agency that sold, delivered, or
 transferred the firearm, provided, however, that if the firearm is not a handgun and does not have a serial number, identification number, or identification mark assigned to it, that fact shall be noted in AFS. Any agency without access to AFS shall arrange with the sheriff of the county in which the agency is located to input this information via this system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 745, Sec. 64.   (AB 809)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

30165.

(a) Section 30105 does not apply to the sale, delivery, or transfer of a firearm by a law enforcement agency to a retiring peace officer who is authorized to carry a firearm pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 26300) of Division 5.

(b) Within 10 days of the date that a handgun, and commencing January 1, 2014, any firearm, is sold, delivered, or transferred to that retiring peace officer, the name of the officer and the make, model, serial number, and other identifying characteristics of the firearm being sold, delivered, or transferred shall be entered into the Automated Firearms System (AFS) via the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System (CLETS) by the law enforcement or state agency that sold,
 delivered, or transferred the firearm, provided, however, that if the firearm is not a handgun and does not have a serial number, identification number, or identification mark assigned to it, that fact shall be noted in AFS. Any agency without access to AFS shall arrange with the sheriff of the county in which the agency is located to input this information via this system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 745, Sec. 65.   (AB 809)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  DIVISION 10. SPECIAL RULES RELATING TO PARTICULAR TYPES OF FIREARMS OR FIREARM EQUIPMENT [30210. - 33700.]



  CHAPTER 1. Ammunition [30210. - 30395.]



  ARTICLE 1. Flechette Dart Ammunition or Bullet Containing or Carrying an Explosive Agent [30210. - 30290.]

30210.

Except as provided in Section 30215 and Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Division 2 of Title 2, any person in this state who manufactures or causes to be manufactured, imports into the state, keeps for sale, or offers or exposes for sale, or who gives, lends, or possesses either of the following is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year or imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170:

(a) Any ammunition that contains or consists of any flechette dart.

(b) Any bullet containing or carrying an explosive agent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 43, Sec. 104.   (SB 1023)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

30215.

Section 30210 does not apply to tracer ammunition manufactured for use in a shotgun.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

30290.

Except as provided in Section 30215 and in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Division 2 of Title 2, any ammunition that contains or consists of any flechette dart, or any bullet containing or carrying an explosive agent, is a nuisance and is subject to Section 18010.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Other Restrictions Relating to Ammunition [30300. - 30340.]

30300.

(a) Any person, corporation, or dealer who does any of the following shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail for a term not to exceed six months, or by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both the imprisonment and fine:

(1) Sells any ammunition or reloaded ammunition to a person under 18 years of age.

(2) Sells any ammunition or reloaded ammunition designed and intended for use in a handgun to a person under 21 years of age. Where ammunition or reloaded ammunition may be used in both a rifle and a handgun, it may be sold to a person who is at least 18 years of age, but less than 21 years of age, if
 the vendor reasonably believes that the ammunition is being acquired for use in a rifle and not a handgun.

(3) Supplies, delivers, or gives possession of any ammunition to any minor who the person, corporation, or dealer knows, or using reasonable care should know, is prohibited from possessing that ammunition at that time pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 29610) of Division 9 of Title 4 of Part 6.

(b) Proof that a person, corporation, or dealer, or his or her agent or employee, demanded, was shown, and acted in reasonable reliance upon, bona fide evidence of majority and identity shall be a defense to any criminal prosecution under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

30300.1.

(a) Section 30300 shall not apply to any transaction, sale, or transfer of ammunition between an ammunition vendor, as defined in Section 16151, and any competitor of the 2028 Olympic and Paralympic Games if all of the following are met:

(1) A competitor presents an accredited credential issued by the International Olympic Committee, International Paralympic Committee, International Shooting Sport Federation, or World Shooting Para Sport.

(2) A competitor will participate in any competitive or training event that utilizes firearms and is conducted under the supervision or control of an entity authorized by the International Olympic Committee, International Paralympic
 Committee, International Shooting Sport Federation, or World Shooting Para Sport.

(3) The competitor is accompanied by a responsible adult. The responsible adult shall be one of the following:

(A) A team official who is responsible for the competitor’s participation in any event described in paragraph (2).

(B) A member of the competitor’s applicable National Olympic Committee or National Paralympic Committee.

(C) A legal representative of the competitor.

(4) An ammunition vendor requires bona fide evidence of identity, as defined in Section 16300, a foreign passport, or other travel document used to enter the United States of the competitor and the accredited credential of the entity
 described in paragraph (1) to verify that the person, who is receiving delivery of the ammunition, is the individual described in this section.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2027, and shall become inoperative upon the later of October 1, 2028, or the conclusion of the 2028 Olympic and Paralympic Games, and, as of January 1, 2029, is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 354, Sec. 4.   (AB 191)   Effective September 20, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   Conditionally inoperative on or after October 1, 2028, as prescribed by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

30305.

(a) (1) No person prohibited from owning or possessing a firearm under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29800) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 29900) of Division 9 of this title, or Section 8100 or 8103 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, shall own, possess, or have under custody or control, any ammunition or reloaded ammunition.

(2) A violation of this subdivision is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed one year or in the state prison, by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(b) (1) A person who is not
 prohibited by subdivision (a) from owning, possessing, or having under the person’s custody or control, any ammunition or reloaded ammunition, but who is enjoined from engaging in activity pursuant to an injunction issued pursuant to Section 3479 of the Civil Code against that person as a member of a criminal street gang, as defined in Section 186.22, may not own, possess, or have under the person’s custody or control, any ammunition or reloaded ammunition.

(2) A violation of this subdivision is a misdemeanor.

(c) A violation of subdivision (a) or (b) is justifiable where all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The person found the ammunition or reloaded ammunition or took the ammunition or reloaded ammunition from a person who was committing a crime against the person who found or took the ammunition or
 reloaded ammunition.

(2) The person possessed the ammunition or reloaded ammunition no longer than was necessary to deliver or transport the ammunition or reloaded ammunition to a law enforcement agency for that agency’s disposition according to law.

(3) The person is prohibited from possessing any ammunition or reloaded ammunition solely because that person is prohibited from owning or possessing a firearm only by virtue of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29800) of Division 9 or ammunition or reloaded ammunition because of subdivision (b).

(d) Upon the trial for violating subdivision (a) or (b), the trier of fact shall determine whether the defendant is subject to the exemption created by subdivision (c). The defendant has the burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence that the defendant is subject to
 the exemption provided by subdivision (c).

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

30306.

(a) Any person, corporation, firm, or other business enterprise who supplies, delivers, sells, or gives possession or control of, any ammunition to any person who he or she knows or using reasonable care should know is prohibited from owning, possessing, or having under custody or control, any ammunition or reloaded ammunition pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 30305, is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(b) Any person, corporation, firm, or other business enterprise who supplies, delivers, sells, or gives possession or control of, any ammunition to any person whom the person,
 corporation, firm, or other business enterprise knows or has cause to believe is not the actual purchaser or transferee of the ammunition, with knowledge or cause to believe that the ammunition is to be subsequently sold or transferred to a person who is prohibited from owning, possessing, or having under custody or control any ammunition or reloaded ammunition pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 30305, is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(c) The provisions of this section are cumulative and shall not be construed as restricting the application of any other law. However, an act or omission punishable in different ways by this section and another provision of law shall not be punished under more than one provision.

(History: Amended November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 63, Sec. 8.5.)
-------------------------------------------

30310.

(a) Unless it is with the written permission of the school district superintendent, the superintendent’s designee, or equivalent school authority, no person shall carry ammunition or reloaded ammunition onto school grounds, except sworn law enforcement officers acting within the scope of their duties.

(b) This section shall not apply to any of the following:

(1) A duly appointed peace officer as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2.

(2) A full-time paid peace officer of another state or the federal government who is carrying
 out official duties while in California.

(3) Any person summoned by any of these officers to assist in making an arrest or preserving the peace while that person is actually engaged in assisting the officer.

(4) A member of the military forces of this state or of the United States who is engaged in the performance of that person’s duties.

(5) An armored vehicle guard, who is engaged in the performance of that person’s duties, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 7582.1 of the Business and Professions Code.

(6) Any peace officer, listed in Section 830.1 or 830.2, or subdivision (a) of Section 830.33, whether active or honorably retired.

(7) Any other duly appointed peace officer.

(8) Any honorably retired peace officer listed in subdivision (c) of Section 830.5.

(9) Any other honorably retired peace officer who during the course and scope of his or her appointment as a peace officer was authorized to, and did, carry a firearm. 

(10) (A) A person carrying ammunition or reloaded ammunition onto school grounds that is in a motor vehicle at all times and is within a locked container or within the locked trunk of the vehicle.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, the term “locked container” has the same meaning as set forth
 in Section 16850.

(c) A violation of this section is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for a term not to exceed six months, a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both the imprisonment and fine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 766, Sec. 2.   (SB 707)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

30312.

(a) (1) Commencing January 1, 2018, the sale of ammunition by any party shall be conducted by or processed through a licensed ammunition vendor.

(2) When neither party to an ammunition sale is a licensed ammunition vendor, the seller shall deliver the ammunition to a vendor to process the transaction. The ammunition vendor shall promptly and properly deliver the ammunition to the purchaser, if the sale is not prohibited, as if the ammunition were the vendor’s own merchandise. If the ammunition vendor cannot legally deliver the ammunition to the purchaser, the vendor shall forthwith return the ammunition to the seller. The ammunition vendor may charge the
 purchaser an administrative fee to process the transaction, in an amount to be set by the Department of Justice, in addition to any applicable fees that may be charged pursuant to the provisions of this title.
